dicts/de_DE-1901-ooe/de_DE_OLDSPELL.dic
ablösen/BDIXY
abtippen/BDIXY
abwägen/SJozm
abzumildern/D
albatros/Qqozm
Alleinvertretungsanbefugnis/qm
Amnesty/S
Ananas/ijqm
anfügen/BDIXY
anlauf/Spozm
anwärmen/DIXY
anzahl/Jozm
apoptoseprozeß/QSozm
Aufbruch/Spm
aufdrehen/BDIXY
Auffalten/SJ
aufgangspunkt/EPSTozm
aufsummieren/DIOXY
augenblicksbild/STRozm
ausdifferenzieren/BDIOXY
ausgestalten/SJozm
aussitzen/DIX
ausstülpen/BDIXY
bagatellisieren/DIOXYW
Bahnwärterhaus/Trm
Bariumnitrat/Sm
Bebauen/SJm
Bedrängnis/qm
Befugnis/qm
begossen/AWX
Begräbnis/QSmij
belangen/BDIOXYW
bemerken/DIXY
Bereichern/SJm
bestrichen/AWX
beugungsbild/RSTozm
bewegen/BDIOXYW
bezahlen/SJozm
Biathlonweltcup/Sm
birnbaum/STpozm
Bitternis/qm
bitterspat/STozm
Bonus/qm
Borstenwurm/Srm
Bürokratieabbau/STm
bus/QSozm
Cocktailkleid/STRm
darzubringen/D
defilieren/DIXYW
Dehydratisieren/SJm
demonstrieren/BDIOXY
direktorenwohnhaus/Tozm
Diskretisieren/SJ
disziplinarvorgesetzte/NRozm
Dornstrauch/STrm
drehzapfenabstand/STpozm
durchstimmen/BIXY
durchzustreichen/D
einlaß/QSozm
einmeterbrett/STRMozm
Einpfählen/SJ
einsehen/DIB
einzustechen/D
Elmsfeuer/NSm
entkernen/BDIOXYW
Entlüften/SJm
entschlüsseln/BDIOXY
Erlenstrauch/Srm
Erleuchten/SJm
erlösungswerk/EPSTozm
Erschließungsbus/qm
erschwernis/QSozm
ertasten/BDIOXY
erzählen/DIOXYW
etiketteverstoß/Tpozm
faunsgesicht/STRozm
filtern/BDIXYW
Firewall/Sm
Fjordland/STrm
Flohzirkus/qm
flüsterwitz/EPTozm
folklorekleid/STRozm
formulieren/SJozm
Fraktionierungsprozeß/QSm
Franchisevertrag/STpm
Gaffelrad/STrm
Gebotsschild/RSTm
gegeneinanderstehen/DIX
Geißeln/SJWm
Gelenkobus/qm
Geothermalgebiet/EPSTm
Gerben/SJ
gewinnerbild/STRozm
Gewölbegang/STpm
Glasurriß/QSm
Grabmal/EPSrm
gremienmitglied/STRozm
Häftlingsfreikauf/STpm
hefekuchen/Sozm
Heiermann/Sr
Hemipenis/Qq
herausrufen/IXD
Herdenmitglied/STRm
heuervertrag/STpozm
hinabmußt/W
hinausführen/DIXY
hinführen/SJozm
hinstellen/BDIXY
hungerstreiken/D
Hutewald/STr
iltis/QSozm
import/EPSTozm
innungsmitglied/STRozm
Interrogativpronomen/S
juckausschlag/Spozm
Kapuzenband/Trm
kassiopeiamond/EPSTozm
kehren/DIVXYW
klettern/Sozm
knarren/DIXYW
knickfuß/Tpozm
Knorpelkraut/STrm
koaxialanschluß/QSozm
Kodifizieren/SJ
Kommunemitglied/STRm
komprimieren/BDIXY
Koranmanuskript/EPSTm
Kriegsgefangenenstatus/qm
Krokus/Qqm
Krummhorn/STrm
kubieren/DIOXYW
Kürlauf/STpm
laokoonbildnis/QSozm
Larvenhabitat/EPSm
Legendenbild/STRm
lehnwort/STrozm
leid/STozm
Machandelbaum/Spm
Majoratsgut/Trm
manipulieren/SJozm
Masernausbruch/STpm
masseschwerpunkt/Sozm
Mathematikerkongreß/QSm
Maxglan/SR
Metrobus/qm
missionsauftrag/STpozm
Mittelmeerland/STrm
mitzubringen/D
montieren/BDIOXY
Musikerstatus/qm
nachbarschaftshaus/Trozm
nachlaß/QSozm
nachsprechen/Sozm
Nahfeld/STR
Neuformieren/SJ
Niedrigenergiehaus/Trm
Niesanfall/Spm
norden/SWozm
Obus/q
offenzulegen/D
palmnuß/Qozm
papyrusboot/EPSTozm
Parvovirus/qm
Patriarchenamt/STrm
Paulette/S
Pflückkraft/pm
Phlegmatikus/q
Pinbrett/SRm
praktizieren/BDIOXY
Prämienhöchstsatz/Tpm
präsidiumsbeschluß/QSozm
Priapswurm/STrm
proletarierstatus/qozm
Prostituieren/SJm
quadermauerwerk/STozm
quengeln/DIXYW
Ramskopf/STp
Reichsdeputationshauptschluß/Qm
Reitersmann/STrm
rekultivierungsplan/STpozm
rind/RSTozm
riskieren/DIOXY
Rücknahmevertrag/STpm
Saarkampf/STm
Sakramentshaus/Trm
satinrock/STpozm
säulenportikus/qozm
Schädigungsprozeß/QSm
schaffen/BDIVXYW
schenken/SJozm
schlichtkleid/STRozm
schocken/BDIXYW
schüttdamm/STpozm
Seelsorgeamt/STrm
selchen/öIXYDW
seminarabschluß/QSozm
Service/Smij
sichtbarkeitszyklus/qozm
skizzenbuch/STrozm
sozius/qozm
spaßen/DIVXY
speerstoß/Tpozm
stall/STpozm
Stammheim/R
steigungsverhältnis/QSozm
Strömungsgeräusch/EPSTm
stückeln/SJozm
sudern/öIXYDW
Symposium/Spm
Teammitglied/STRm
teichfrosch/STozm
Thermalbadehaus/Trm
Triggereingang/Spm
trockenrasen/Sozm
Troß/QSm
tubus/qozm
überkleben/DIOXY
überleben/BDIOXY
übertreiben/DIXW
Umformatieren/SJm
umverteilungsdruck/STozm
unterzurühren/D
venuszyklus/qozm
Verdachen/SJm
verdichtungsprozeß/QSozm
verglühen/DIOXYW
Verketzern/SJm
verlängern/BDIOXYW
Verlustrücktrag/STpm
Verschnüren/SJ
versickerungsprozeß/QSozm
Verstummen/S
vertäuen/DIOXYW
vorbelegen/BDIOXY
Vorruhestandsgeld/STRm
vulkanexplosivitätsindex/Tozm
wahren/DIXY
Weihedenkmal/Srm
Wirklichkeitsbezug/STpm
Wirrnis/Qm
wuseln/DIXYW
zeitvertreib/STozm
zerkochen/DIOXYW
zerwühlen/DIOXYW
Zierrat/dEPTm
zuneigen/SJozm
zunftmitglied/STRozm
zusammenpferchen/IXYD
zusammenziehen/BIXD
